Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 22-23-101.
Laws governing; costs.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, a municipal election shall be governed by laws regulating statewide elections. The municipality holding any election shall pay the actual costs of the election, or an equitably proportioned share of a concurrent election as determined by the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-311; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2.

§ 22-23-102.
Qualifications of municipal officers.

All municipal offices are nonpartisan, and municipal officers shall be qualified electors residing in the municipality and any ward established under W.S.

22-23-103

or 15-11-105(b).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-312; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to qualifications of electors, see §

22-3-102

.

Requirement that municipal officers be “resident in the municipality” is clear and unambiguous.

Karn v. Hayes, 530 P.2d 156,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1975).

Dwelling or habitation place within municipal boundaries required.—

One may not be a candidate for municipal office in a city or town without having and maintaining a dwelling or place of habitation physically situated within the municipal boundaries of such city or town. Karn v. Hayes, 530 P.2d 156,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1975).

Where there was no showing that appellant had a place of fixed habitation within corporate limits

of the city to which she had the intention of returning, she had not brought herself within the statutory qualifications to stand for election in that city. Karn v. Hayes, 530 P.2d 156,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1975).

Candidate's failure to be registered. —

Candidate's failure to be registered to vote at the time of filing her application for nomination was inconsequential and a mere irregularity since shortly thereafter she reregistered and met all criteria during the primary election, the general election, and at the time she assumed the municipal office. Rue v. Carter, 919 P.2d 633,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 22-23-103.
Division of city into wards; residency.

A city may be divided into wards by ordinance of the governing body of the city. The wards shall be compact in form and as nearly equal in population as possible.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a person shall not be a candidate for the council from a ward for the purpose of meeting residency requirements for the city ward, unless he has been a resident of that ward for at least one (1) year next preceding his election.

In any general election year in which city wards are redrawn but not enacted into law at least one (1) year prior to the applicable filing periods, a person may be a candidate for a ward if he:

Is a resident of the city on the date he files an application under W.S.

22-5-204

or a petition under W.S.

22-5-301

; and

Has been a resident of the city for at least one (1) year next preceding his election.

A person seeking election from a ward as provided under subsection (c) of this section, including a councilman whose term otherwise would expire as a result of completing his term of office, shall be a resident of the ward at the time he takes office.

Following the redrawing of ward boundaries, a councilman whose term of office does not expire following the next general election shall continue to serve until the completion of his term.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-313; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 69, § 1.

§ 22-23-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, provided that the provisions of chapter 24 of the Election Code would apply to municipal elections.